California statutes. Civil Code
 federally or state chartered bank or savings and loan association doing business in this state or by a qualified mortgage banker. As used in this section “qualified mortgage banker” means a lender (1) meeting the criteria established by the Government National Mortgage Association for lenders selling over ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in mortgage loans to that organization annually and (2) which either has conducted an ongoing business of mortgage lending in this state for not less than five years immediately preceding the making of the shared appreciation loans, or made over fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in mortgage loans in this state during the 12 months immediately preceding the making of the shared appreciation loan. If a refinancing commitment is arranged by the lender upon origination of the shared appreciation loan, this fact shall be fully and fairly disclosed to the borrower, a copy of the lender’s contract with the bank, savings and loan association or qualified mortgage banker making
 the commitment shall be supplied to the borrower at such time, and the contract shall be fully enforceable by the borrower as a third-party beneficiary thereto, but the lender shall not be a guarantor of the obligation of the bank, savings and loan association, or qualified mortgage banker to provide refinancing.

If the original lender is a bank or savings and loan association doing business in this state or a qualified mortgage banker, it may provide the refinancing commitment to the borrower required by this section and assignees or successors in interest of the original lender shall not be guarantors of the refinancing obligation, provided the shared appreciation loan contains this limitation, which is fully and fairly disclosed to the borrower, and the original lender’s refinancing commitment is fully enforceable by the borrower.

(b) The term of the loan for refinancing shall be established so that
 the borrower’s repayment schedule provides for the final installment payment not less than 30 years from the date of origination of the shared appreciation loan. However, if loans at that duration are not available, within the meaning of subdivision (d), the lender or other obligor shall give the borrower a choice of any form of loan and maturity for that type of loan which is available at the time of refinancing, within the meaning of subdivision (d). The lender or other obligor shall inform the borrower of the types of loans (and maturities) available for refinancing under this section not less than 60 days prior to maturity of the shared appreciation loan.

(c) The interest rate for the refinancing loan shall not exceed rates generally available in the market for the type of loan instrument provided under subdivision (d) at the time of maturity of the shared appreciation loan. No loan origination fees shall be required of the borrower, either
 as prepaid interest or for processing services, as a condition of obtaining a refinancing loan pursuant to this section, but the borrower may be required to pay the costs of obtaining a policy of title insurance in accordance with the lender’s requirements. The refinancing loan need not be a fixed interest rate loan, subject to the limitations of subdivision (d).

(d) The refinancing loan may be any form of loan which, at the time of refinancing, is generally offered to and utilized by the public for financing housing like the borrower’s property by banks or savings and loan associations doing business in this state.

(e) The lender may require as a condition of the refinancing loan that it be secured by a deed of trust having a lien of first priority.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.134.

Except as provided in this article, the terms and conditions of the refinancing loan shall be subject to all laws applicable to loans in effect on the date of refinancing.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.135.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the borrower from obtaining any other financing, in lieu of the refinancing provided for in Section 1917.133, including refinancing on other terms mutually agreeable to the borrower and lender.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Determination of Fair Market Value [1917.140. - 1917.142.]

1917.140.

The borrower may, at any time for the purpose of facilitating a sale of the property, request the lender to stipulate the minimum amount which the lender considers to be the fair market value of the property for the purposes of this chapter. The lender shall advise the borrower within 10 working days of the receipt of such request of the lender’s estimate of the minimum fair market value. The estimate shall remain effective for purposes of this section for 90 days. For the purposes of this section and Section 1917.141, a sale of the property shall be deemed to have occurred
 within the 90-day period if there is a valid contract entered by an offer and acceptance within the 90-day period for the sale of the property. The lender’s stipulation shall remain effective for an additional 60 days following execution of the sale contract to permit completion of the sale and close of escrow.

The lender shall not be liable to the borrower or any other party on account of damages alleged as a result of providing the stipulation or estimate required by this section if such stipulation or estimate is made in good faith. Evidence of lack of good faith shall include, but not be limited to, a showing that the lender has willfully or repeatedly overrepresented the fair market value of other properties in similar situations, applying equitable principles to those determinations. The lender shall be conclusively presumed to have acted in good faith and no action may be brought or maintained against a lender which arises out of the provision by the lender
 of such stipulation or estimate, if the lender relied upon an appraisal of an independent appraiser approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.141.

(a) In the case of a sale for cash within 90 days after the lender stipulates, under the provisions of Section 1917.140, a minimum amount which the lender considers to be the fair market value of the property, the fair market value shall be the gross sale price, unless the gross sales price is below the minimum amount stipulated by the lender and the lender contests in writing the reasonableness of the gross sale price in relation to the fair market value within 10 working days of the lender’s receipt of notice of the gross sale price from borrower, in
 which case fair market value shall be the greater of gross sale price or the amount determined under Section 1917.142.

(b) In the case of a sale for cash where the borrower has not requested the lender under the provisions of Section 1917.140 to stipulate to the minimum amount which the lender considers to be the fair market value of the property or where the stipulated minimum amount was provided by the lender more than 90 days prior to the date of sale, fair market value shall be the gross sale price, unless lender contests in writing the reasonableness of the gross sale price in relation to the fair market value within 10 working days of the lender’s receipt of notice of the gross sale price from borrower, in which case fair market value shall be the greater of gross sale price or the amount determined under Section 1917.142.

(c) In the case of a sale which includes
 consideration to the seller other than cash, fair market value shall be as determined under Section 1917.142.

(d) In the case the shared appreciation loan is prepaid in full, or upon acceleration of the shared appreciation loan upon default, or upon maturity of the shared appreciation loan, fair market value shall be as determined under Section 1917.142.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.142.

When Section 1917.141 requires the application of this section, the fair market value shall be determined as the average of two appraisals of the property performed as described in this section. If possible, the appraisals shall be based on the sale prices of comparable properties in the market area sold within the preceding three-month period. The appraisals shall be made upon request of the lender by two independent residential appraisers, one to be selected by the lender and one by the borrower. Each appraiser shall be approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association.
 The cost of the appraiser selected by the lender shall be borne by the lender, and the cost of the appraiser selected by the borrower shall be borne by the borrower, unless the average of the two appraisals equals or is less than the gross sale price of the property, in which case the lender shall also pay the fee of the borrower’s appraiser up to two hundred dollars ($200). If either of the appraisers determines that the gross sale price does not reasonably reflect the fair market value of the property, or, in the case of a sale for which appraisal is required by this section, then the fair market value of the property shall be determined as the average of the two appraisals. If the borrower fails to select a qualified appraiser within 15 days after the lender has notified the borrower in writing of the lender’s request for an appraisal of the property, the reasons therefor, and the borrower’s option to select an independent appraiser within 15 days after the lender’s request is submitted to the borrower,
 the lender may designate the second appraiser, provided the lender’s request informs the borrower of this time limitation, and that the lender will select an appraiser on behalf of the borrower in the event the borrower fails to designate an appraiser, with consequent cost to the borrower. If pursuant to this section the lender designates the second appraiser, the cost of both appraisals shall be borne equally by the borrower and lender. If in any case the property has been damaged (other than normal wear and tear) and the damage has not been fully repaired, the determination of fair market value shall be based on the condition of the property not including the damage.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the borrower and lender from establishing the fair market value of the property by mutual agreement in lieu of appraisals pursuant to this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Improvements [1917.150. - 1917.151.]

1917.150.

The borrower may have the value of capital improvements added to the borrower’s cost of the property, for purposes of determining net appreciated value and the amount of contingent deferred interest, but only if the procedures set forth in this article are followed.

(a) Within 60 days following the completion of capital improvements during any 12-month period with a cost in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the borrower shall send by first-class mail a notice of the completion of the
 improvements to the lender and shall submit proof of cost and an estimate of the increase in value of the property by reason of the improvements.

(b) If, within 30 days of receipt of the notice, the lender questions the claimed increase in value of the property by reason of the improvements, the lender and the borrower may, by mutual agreement, establish the value of the capital improvements or the lender may require appraisal of the property. An appraisal shall be made to determine the increase in value of the property, if any, by reason of the improvements, by two appraisers selected in the same manner specified in Section 1917.142. If appraisals are performed, the increase in value resulting from the improvements for the purposes of this section, shall be one-half of the sum of the two appraisals. The cost of the appraiser selected by the borrower shall be borne by the borrower, and the cost of the appraiser selected by the lender shall be
 borne by the lender.

(c) A credit for the value of capital improvements shall be provided if the increase in value of the property resulting therefrom is determined pursuant to subdivision (b) to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(d) If 50 percent or more of the value of the labor or other work on the improvements was performed by the borrower, then the actual cost of the improvements need not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for purposes of making application under subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.151.

Nothing in this article shall preclude a shared appreciation loan from providing the borrower with a greater credit for improvements than specified in this article, provided the relevant disclosures required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 1917.170) are appropriately modified to accurately disclose the terms of the credit.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. General Provisions [1917.160. - 1917.168.]

1917.160.

The relationship of the borrower and the lender, as to a shared appreciation loan, is that of debtor and creditor and shall not be, or be construed to be, a joint venture, equity venture, partnership, or other relationship.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.161.

Any waiver of any right of a borrower under the provisions of this chapter shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.162.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 711, a provision in a shared appreciation loan made pursuant to this chapter permitting the lender to accelerate the maturity date of the principal and accrued interest on the loan upon sale of the property shall be valid and enforceable against the borrower, except as may be precluded by Section 2924.6.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that potential exposure to liability for enforcement of a “due-on-sale” clause consistent with Section 711, as interpreted
 by the courts, makes use of such a provision impractical. Moreover, the additional risks to the lender inherent in shared appreciation financing are greater with longer loan terms (which are more desirable from the standpoint of housing affordability), but this risk is reduced with an enforceable “due-on-sale” clause. Therefore, in order to facilitate shared appreciation financing, it is necessary to establish the exception specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.163.

This chapter facilitates the making of shared appreciation financing in this state which conforms to the provisions of this chapter. The terms and conditions of any shared appreciation loan made pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with this chapter. This chapter does not, however, apply to or limit shared appreciation financing of real property of a type specified in Section 1917.130 that is made pursuant to other provisions of law, or which is not otherwise unlawful. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to in any way affect shared appreciation financing of
 commercial property or residential property not meeting the criteria specified in Section 1917.130.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.164.

A shared appreciation loan shall not be subject to any provision of this code or the Financial Code which limits the interest rate or change of interest rate of variable interest rate or renegotiable interest instruments, or which requires particular language or provisions in security instruments securing variable or renegotiable rate obligations or in evidences of those debts.

This section is declaratory of existing law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.165.

The lien of a deed of trust securing a shared appreciation loan shall include and secure the principal amount of the shared appreciation loan, and all interest, whether accrued or to be accrued, including all amounts of contingent deferred interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.166.

The lien of a shared appreciation loan, including the principal amount and all interest, whether accrued or to be accrued, and all amounts of contingent deferred interest, shall attach from the time of the recordation of the deed of trust securing the loan, and the lien, including the lien of the interest accrued or to be accrued and of the contingent deferred
 interest, shall have priority over any other lien or encumbrance affecting the property secured by the shared appreciation instrument, recorded after the time of recordation of the shared appreciation instrument. However, nothing in this section or Section 1917.165 shall preclude a junior lien or encumbrance subordinate to the obligation of the shared appreciation loan. In no case may a junior lien achieve priority over the lien securing the obligation of the shared appreciation loan, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede Section 8450.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 11.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Amendment operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.   Section inoperative January 1, 1987 (as part of Chapter 5, comm. with Section 1917.110), pursuant to Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.167.

A shared appreciation loan which at origination bears a fixed interest rate complying with the usury provisions of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not be deemed to become usurious by reason of the payment of contingent deferred interest pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.168.

The qualification requirements of Sections 25110, 25120, and 25130 of the Corporations Code do not apply to a shared appreciation loan to the extent the exemption afforded by subdivision (p) of Section 25100 of that code is applicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Notices and Disclosures [1917.170. - 1917.175.]

1917.170.

(a) The disclosures made pursuant to this chapter, as required, shall be the only disclosures required to be made pursuant to state law for shared appreciation loans, notwithstanding any contrary provision applicable to loans not made under this chapter, except those, if any, that may be required by reason of the application of Division 1 (commencing with Section 25000) of the Corporations Code, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code. However, a lender shall not be precluded from
 supplementing the disclosures required by this chapter with additional disclosures that are not inconsistent with the disclosures required by this chapter.

(b) Whenever specific language is prescribed by this chapter, substantially the same language shall be utilized if possible, but reasonably equivalent language may be used to the extent necessary or appropriate to achieve a clearer or more accurate disclosure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.171.

(a) Each lender offering shared appreciation loans shall furnish to a prospective borrower, on the earlier of the dates on which the lender first provides written information concerning shared appreciation loans from the lender or provides a loan application form to the prospective borrower, a written disclosure as provided in this section.

(b) The disclosure shall be entitled “INFORMATION ABOUT THE (Name of Lender) SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN,” and shall describe the operation and effect of
 the shared appreciation loan including a brief summary of its terms and conditions, together with a statement consisting of substantially the following language, to the extent applicable to such loan: 
INFORMATION ABOUT THE (Name of Lender) SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN
(Name of Lender) is pleased to offer you the opportunity to finance your home through a shared appreciation loan.

Because the shared appreciation loan differs from the usual mortgage loan, the law requires that you have a detailed explanation of the special features of the loan before you apply. Before you sign your particular shared appreciation loan documents, you will receive more information about your particular shared appreciation loan, which you should read and understand before you sign the loan documents.

The loan will bear a stated rate of interest which will be (percent) below the prevailing market interest rate. In exchange for a stated interest rate which is below the prevailing rate, you will be obligated to pay us additional interest later. This additional interest is called “contingent interest.”

The loan will require a balloon payment at the end of the _____ year. Thus, if you do not sell the property before that time, you will need to refinance the loan at that time. 
Contingent Interest
This loan provides that you, as borrower, must pay to us, as lender, as contingent interest, (percent) of the net appreciated value of the real property which secures the loan. This contingent interest is due and payable when the property is sold or transferred, when the loan is paid in
 full, upon any acceleration of the loan upon default, or at the end of the term of the loan, whichever first occurs. The dollar amount of contingent interest, if any, which you will be required to pay cannot be determined at this time. If the property does not appreciate, you will owe us nothing. The contingent interest will not become due if title to the property is transferred on your death to a spouse, or where a transfer results from a decree of dissolution of a marriage and a spouse becomes the sole owner.

Your obligation to pay contingent interest will reduce the amount of the appreciation, if any, that you will realize on the property. This appreciation will not produce a real gain in your equity in the property, unless the appreciation rate exceeds the general inflation rate, but you will be required to pay a portion of the appreciation as contingent interest without regard to whether the appreciation has resulted in a real gain.

When you sell or refinance your home, you normally will receive enough cash to pay the shared appreciation loan balance, accrued interest, prepayment charge (if applicable), contingent interest, and expenses of sale. However, if you sell with only a small downpayment, you may possibly not receive enough cash to pay the contingent interest, and, in that event, it will be necessary for you to provide cash from other funds. Calculating the Contingent InterestContingent interest will be calculated as follows:FAIR MARKET VALUE OF
 THE PROPERTY (Sale price or apprasied value.)–(less)BORROWER’S COST OF THE PROPERTY (This amount includes certain costs paid by you incident to the purchase.)–(less)VALUE OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS MADE BY YOU (Must exceed $2,500 in value. Must also exceed $2,500 in cost unless you perform more than 50% of the value of the labor or work on the improvement.)_(equals)NET APPRECIATED VALUE×(times)______ PERCENT OWED TO LENDER_(equals)TOTAL CONTINGENT INTERESTDetermining Fair Market Value
If you sell your property for cash before maturity of your shared appreciation loan, the gross sale price will be the fair market value of the
 property, unless appraisals are requested by us and the appraisals average more than the gross sale price. However, at your request, we also will tell you what we consider to be the fair market value of the property. If you sell for cash for a gross sale price that equals or exceeds that amount, the gross sale price will control and appraisals will not be needed.

Fair market value is determined by appraisals in the event of sales involving a consideration other than cash, prepayment of the loan in full, or maturity of the loan.

When appraisals are required, fair market value is determined by averaging two independent appraisals of the property. You may select one of the two appraisers from a list approved by the Federal National Mortgage Association. If appraisals are requested by us, we will provide you with full information on how to select an appraiser.

In lieu of appraisals, we
 may establish fair market value at an agreed amount if an agreement can be reached between you and us. 
Determining Value of Capital Improvements
Capital improvements with a value exceeding $2,500 (but no maintenance or repair costs) may be added to your cost of the property for the purpose of determining the net appreciated value, but only if the procedures set forth in the shared appreciation loan documents are followed. It is important to note that capital improvements completed and claimed in any 12-month period must add more than $2,500 in value to the property and must generally also cost more than $2,500. However, if you have performed at least half the value of the labor or other work involved, then the cost of the improvements will not be considered. The appraised value of the improvements will be the increase in the value of the property resulting
 from the improvements. You will receive no credit for minor or major repairs or for improvements that are not appraised at more than $2,500, but the lender will acquire a share of any resulting appreciation in the value of the property. 
Determining Net Appreciated Value
We are entitled to receive __ percent of the net appreciated value of the property as contingent interest. As shown in the chart above, net appreciated value equals (1) the fair market value of the property at the time of the sale or appraisal, less (2) your cost of the property, less (3) the value of any capital improvements for which you are entitled to credit. 
Balloon Payment of Principal
If you do not sell the property before the end of the
 term of this loan, you will need to refinance this loan at that time. The term of this loan is (duration) years. We [are not obligated to refinance either the unpaid balance of the loan or the contingent interest at that time; you alone will be responsible for obtaining refinancing] [will offer or arrange with another lender to refinance the outstanding obligation, including any contingent interest, at that time]. If you refinance this loan, your monthly payments may increase substantially if the property appreciates significantly or if the interest rate on the refinancing loan is much higher than today’s prevailing rates. In general, the more your property appreciates, the larger will be the amount of the contingent interest that you will have an obligation to pay or refinance. 
Your Right to Refinance This Loan
(For loans with a refinancing obligation)
If the property is not sold or transferred prior to the maturity of the loan, we will offer or arrange with another lender to refinance the outstanding obligation of the loan, including any contingent interest. The refinancing will be at the then prevailing interest rate.

The terms of the refinancing loan will be like those of home loans offered at that time by banks or savings and loan associations. If at the time of refinancing, banks or savings and loan associations in this state offer loans of sufficient duration, you are assured that the combined length of your shared appreciation loan and refinancing loan will be at least 30 years. However, if loans of sufficient duration are not then offered by banks or savings and loan associations, you may elect any type and maturity of loan then offered by banks or savings and loan associations.

We will not be permitted to look to the
 forecast of your income in offering or arranging for your refinancing loan. The interest rate and specific terms of any refinancing loan will be subject to then-prevailing market conditions. The interest rate and monthly payment upon refinancing cannot be determined at this time. They may be either more or less burdensome to you than the currently prevailing rates and terms. 
Tax Consequences
(For all loans)
USE OF THE SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN WILL HAVE INCOME TAX OR ESTATE PLANNING CONSEQUENCES WHICH WILL DEPEND UPON YOUR OWN FINANCIAL AND TAX SITUATION. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, YOU ARE URGED TO CONSULT YOUR OWN ACCOUNTANT, ATTORNEY, OR OTHER FINANCIAL ADVISOR.

THE QUESTIONS YOU SHOULD DISCUSS INCLUDE THE TAX DEDUCTIBILITY OF THE CONTINGENT INTEREST PAYMENT, YOUR RIGHT TO
 UTILIZE THAT DEDUCTION IN YEARS OTHER THAN THE YEAR IT IS PAID, AND THE EFFECT OF THE LOSS OF TAX BENEFITS BEFORE THAT TIME. 
Other Important Information
(Here insert additional description, if necessary, of the operation and effect of the shared appreciation loan.

The foregoing describes our shared appreciation loan, includes a summary of all of its important provisions, and informs you of some of the risks of a shared appreciation loan.

If your loan application is accepted by us, we will provide you with more information about your particular shared appreciation loan, which will include a comparison with conventional mortgages, an illustration of the possible increase in your monthly payments upon refinancing, and other important information.

Before you enter into a shared appreciation loan with us, we recommend that you and your attorney or tax accountant review the loan documents for the full text of all of the terms and conditions which will govern the loan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.172.

(a) Each lender making a shared appreciation loan shall also furnish to the prospective borrower, prior to the consummation of the loan, the disclosures required by Subpart C of Federal Reserve Board Regulation Z (12 CFR Part 226), including 12 CFR Section 226.18(f), to the extent applicable to the transaction.

(b) The disclosure made pursuant to subdivision (a) and Regulation Z shall be based on the fixed interest rate of the shared appreciation loan, and shall include a description of the
 shared appreciation feature, including (1) the conditions for its imposition, the time at which it would be collected, and the limitations on the lender’s share, as required by the Federal Reserve Board in the information published by the board in 46 Federal Register 20877-78 (April 7, 1981), and (2) the lender’s share of the net appreciated value and the prevailing interest rate as defined in Section 1917.120 of the Civil Code.

(c) The disclosure made pursuant to subdivision (a) and Regulation Z shall be accompanied by (1) one or more transaction-specific examples of the operation and effect of the shared appreciation loan and (2) the following charts comparing the shared appreciation loan and a conventional loan made at the prevailing interest rate, and illustrating the possible increase in the monthly payments, and the possible annual percentage rate of finance charge, on the assumptions therein stated: Chart 1CONVENTIONAL MORTGAGE AT ____%If the same loan balance were financed under a conventional, 30-year, fixed-rate, level-payment mortgage, your monthly payments would be:Years 1–30$_______/mo.Chart 2IF YOU REFINANCE THIS TRANSACTION AT ___%If your property appreciates at 10% per year, and if your loan balance (including contingent interest due) at the end of __ years is refinanced at __% (the prevailing market interest rate now), your monthly payments will be:Years
 1–__Refinancing loan$_______/mo.$_______/mo.**Refinancing loan, assuming a conventional, 30-year, fixed-rate, level-payment mortgage. Other mortgage instruments, e.g., graduated-payment or shared-appreciation, if available, may result in lower payments.Chart 3APR IF PROPERTY APPRECIATES AT 10%If your property appreciates at 10% per year, the total finance charge on your shared appreciation loan (including contingent interest) will equal $____, and the annual percentage rate of the total finance charge (including contingent interest) will equal ____%.(d) The disclosures required by subdivision (c) shall be separate from the disclosures
 required by Regulation Z, and may be presented in the document containing the disclosures required by Regulation Z or in one or more separate documents.

(e) Except to the extent that this section requires disclosure of additional information not required by Regulation Z, compliance with the applicable credit disclosure requirements of Regulation Z shall constitute compliance with the requirements of this section.

(f) The disclosure prescribed in Section 1917.171 shall be physically attached to the disclosures required by this section and Regulation Z at the time the Regulation Z disclosures are furnished to the borrower.

(g) In the event federal law is amended so that this section is inconsistent therewith, the federal law shall prevail as to the disclosures required by this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.173.

Each lender making a shared appreciation loan shall additionally furnish to the prospective borrower, prior to consummation of the loan, a statement containing the following information:
IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT YOUR SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN

You are being offered a shared appreciation loan. Before you decide to accept this loan, read this statement, which is designed to provide important information you should consider.

1. Prevailing
 interest rate: __%.

2. Interest rate on this loan: __%.

3. Lender’s share of net appreciated value: __%.

4. Amount of this loan: $__.

5. Amount of the monthly payments: $__.

6. Term of this loan: __ years.

7. Amortization period on which payments are calculated: __ years.

8. Prepayment charge (if any): __.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.174.

Each deed of trust and evidence of debt executed in connection with a shared appreciation loan shall contain a statement, printed or written in a size equal to at least 12-point bold type, consisting of substantially the following language: “THIS IS A [DURATION] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN. THE LENDER'S INTEREST INCLUDES [PERCENT] OF THE NET APPRECIATED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY. A BALLOON PAYMENT OF PRINCIPAL WILL BE REQUIRED. FOR FURTHER INFORMATION, READ THE FLYER ENTITLED "INFORMATION ABOUT THE [NAME OF LENDER] SHARED APPRECIATION LOAN. ”’ The notice
 required by this section shall be completed to state the terms of the shared appreciation loan and the lender’s share of the net appreciated value.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.175.

Where, pursuant to any provision of law, the lender is required to disclose the amount of interest due or to be due under a shared appreciation loan and the amount of contingent deferred interest due or to be due is not known, the lender may disclose that fact and specify in the disclosure the method for calculating contingent deferred interest.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.   Inoperative January 1, 1987, by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 12.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Loans of E.R.I.S.A. Pension Funds [1917.210. - 1917.220.]

1917.210.

Each pension fund or retirement system which is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406), shall not be required to obtain any license or certificate in order to provide funds for any type of loan transaction permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.220.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligation of, loan made by, or forbearance of, any pension fund or retirement system which is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406).

This section creates and authorizes pension funds or retirement systems subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (P.L. 93-406) as an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV
of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Shared Appreciation Loans for Seniors [1917.320. - 1917.714.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1917.320. - 1917.320.]

1917.320.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Actual contingent interest” means the lender’s appreciation share of the net appreciated amount. In no event, however, shall the rate of appreciation upon which actual contingent interest is calculated at the end of the loan term exceed 212 times the rate at which projected contingent interest had been calculated.

(b) “Actual life expectancy” shall be calculated based upon
 actuarial tables for women only, regardless of the sex of the borrower, and acceptable to both the state and the insurance industry.

(c) “Annuity base amount” means the projected loan amount less (1) the initial advance and (2) the projected contingent interest based on the reasonable appreciation rate used in calculating the projected loan amount.

(d) “Borrower” means the recipient or recipients of a shared appreciation loan for seniors who is obligated by execution of a promissory note and who is at least 65 years of age.
